Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-516
Trustees; bond;
terms; approval; filing; fee; cost paid by association.

If the trustees of any cemetery association receive the gift of any property, real or personal, in their
own name, in trust, for the perpetual care of the cemetery,
or anything connected therewith, the trustees shall, upon the
enactment of bylaws to that effect by the association, give a bond to the association of at least one thousand dollars,
conditioned for the faithful administration of the trust
and care of the funds and property. The bond shall be filed with and approved by the county clerk of the county in which the association is located, and the
clerk shall be paid the same fee for approving and filing the bond
as fixed
by law for approving and filing official bonds. The cost of the bond
shall be paid by the cemetery association.

Laws 1925, c. 138, § 1, p. 367;

C.S.1929, § 13-505;

Laws 1941, c. 18, § 1, p. 106;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 13-505;

R.S.1943, § 12-516;

Laws 1980, LB 909, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB863, § 9.